Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 350.345, as amended by section 7, chapter 46, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
350.345. (1) No later than October 1 of each year,  each institution of higher education shall
submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to:
(a) The Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives;
(b) The interim committees of the Legislative Assembly relating to higher education;
(c) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission; and
(d) The Director of Human Services.
(2) [ Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, ] The report shall  include  the following
information, along with an optional narrative section for each of the following in  which the
institution may, at its discretion, explain the information :
(a) The total number of allegations of sexual misconduct  during the previous  academic year
that were  reported to the institution’s Title IX coordinator by a student or employee of the institu-
tion against :
(A) Another student or employee of the institution [ during the previous academic year ]; or
(B) An unknown individual or  an individual for whom the institution categorizes the re-
port as “other.”
(b) The number of  law enforcement investigations known to have been initiated during the pre-
vious academic year in response to reports of sexual misconduct that  were brought forward by a
student or employee of the institution [ against another student or employee of the institution; ].
(c) The number of students and employees at the institution who were found  responsible during
the previous academic year for violating the institution’s policies prohibiting sexual misconduct[ ;].
(d) The number of students and employees at  the institution who during the previous academic
year, faced academic or employment disciplinary action due to having violated the institution’s pol-
icies prohibiting sexual misconduct[ ;].
(e) The number of students and employees at the institution who, during the previous academic
year, were investigated, but found not  responsible for having violated the institution’s policies pro-
hibiting sexual misconduct[ ;]. If the number under this paragraph exceeds eight, the report
must include a narrative  section describing why sexual misconduct cases were closed, in-
Enrolled House Bill 3731 (HB 3731-A) Page 1
cluding the most common reasons, and may also  include campus-specific categories of rea-
sons for each investigation being closed and a total number for each category.
(f) The number of [ students at the institution ] complainants who, during the previous academic
year, requested supportive measures[ ;].
(g) The number of supportive measures requested by  each [ student] complainant described in
paragraph (f) of this subsection[ ;].
(h) The number  of supportive measures granted to each [ student] complainant described in
paragraph (f) of this subsection[ ;]. The institution may use the optional narrative section that
accompanies the number under this paragraph  to describe the supportive measures provided
to complainants, and to include, at the institution’s discretion, a list of  supportive measures,
including emergency housing, if available, offered by the institution, and the number of times
each supportive measure was used.
[(i) The number of students during the previous academic year who took a leave of  absence,
transferred to a different institution of higher education or withdrew from the institution of higher ed-
ucation;]
[(j)] (i) The number of students or employees of  the institution who reported experiencing sexual
misconduct at the institution but who declined to participate or requested no investigation[ ; and ].
[(k)] (j) The number of ongoing investigations into an accusation of sexual misconduct.
(k) The  types of violence reported at the institution. For any institution with greater
than eight reports under this paragraph,  the institution shall provide a narrative section
describing the types of sexual misconduct experienced on the campus of the institution and
may also include any campus-specific  categories of sexual misconduct experienced on the
campus of the institution and the number of reports for each category.
(L) A section for narrative discussion in which the institution may:
(A) Describe any work being done at the institution to  ensure the institution has accu-
rate information;
(B) Explain any trends and changes in data regarding the numbers being reported;
(C) Discuss any supportive measures provided or potential  gaps in supportive measures
being provided; and
(D) Discuss how the institution is working to eliminate sexual  misconduct on the campus
of the institution.
[(3) A report submitted by a community college operated under ORS  chapter 341 or a career school
as defined in ORS 345.010 is not required to include the information described in  subsection (2)(i) of
this section.]
[(4)] (3) The information provided in the report must be provided in an anonymous and aggregate
manner that complies with all state and federal privacy laws.
(4) Notwithstanding the page limit described in  ORS 192.245 (1), the executive summary
for a report submitted under this section has no page limit.
SECTION 2.
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this  section, the amendments
to ORS 350.345 by  section 1 of this 2025 Act first apply to reports submitted for the 2025-2026
academic year.
(2) The narrative section required by ORS 350.345 (2)(L), as amended by section 1 of  this
2025 Act, first applies to reports submitted for the 2024-2025 academic year.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3731 (HB 3731-A) Page 2
Passed by House April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3731 (HB 3731-A) Page 3